Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4091.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 12, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1738, to read: START_STATUTE41-1738. Tribal government rural law enforcement enhancement grant program; administration; purposes; fund; annual report A. The Tribal government rural law enforcement enhancement grant program is established to provide grant monies to tribal governmental entities in this state with reservation land that is located primarily in a county with a population of less than five hundred thousand persons for any of the following: 1. Hiring new law enforcement officers and personnel. 2. Retaining current law enforcement officers. 3. Purchasing communication equipment. 4. Funding information technology improvement projects. 5. Reimbursing expenses related to investigating turquoise alerts pursuant to section 41-1728.01. B. The department shall administer the grant program and may adopt rules, policies and procedures to carry out the purposes of this section. applicants shall submit an application for a grant on a form prescribed by the department. C. The Tribal government rural law enforcement enhancement fund is established consisting of legislative appropriations. The department shall administer the fund. monies in the fund are continuously appropriated and may be used to establish the Tribal government rural law enforcement enhancement grant program pursuant to this section. not more than $100,000 annually may be used to pay the administrative costs of implementing this section. D. On or before December 1, 2027 and each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of the report to the secretary of state regarding the effectiveness of the grant program and any recommendations on how to improve the grant program. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; tribal government rural law enforcement enhancement fund; exemption A. The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the tribal government rural law enforcement enhancement fund established by section 41-1738, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.